Utah statutes.
48-1d-1052.   Plan of domestication.

(1)  A domestic limited liability partnership may become a foreign limited liability partnership in a domestication by approving a plan of domestication.  The plan must be in a record and contain:

(a)  the name of the domesticating limited liability partnership;

(b)  the name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticated limited liability partnership;

(c)  the manner of converting the interests in the domesticating limited liability partnership into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

(d)  the proposed statement of qualification of the domesticated limited liability partnership;

(e)  the full text of the partnership agreement of the domesticated limited liability partnership that are proposed to be in a record;

(f)  the other terms and conditions of the domestication; and

(g)  any other provision required by the law of this state or the partnership agreement of the domesticating limited liability partnership.

(2)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), a plan of domestication may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

